Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 58 O.S. 2021, Section 162, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 162. Every executor, administrator, or guardian
appointed in, but residing out of, the state, shall, before entering
upon the duties of his or her trust, in writing, appoint an agent
residing in the county where he is appointed this state, and shall
by such writing stipulate and agree that the service of any legal
process against him or her as such executor, administrator, or
guardian if made on said the agent shall be of the same legal effect
as if made on himself or herself personally within the state. Such
writing shall give the proper address of such the agent and shall be
filed in the office of the judge of the district court where such
the appointment is made.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1283 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the Senate the 17th day of February, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives














ENGR. S. B. NO. 1283 Page 2